Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF537.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 2698YH (2) 91 as/js H.F. 537 Section 1. Section 80B.11G, Code 2025, is amended to read 1 as follows: 2 80B.11G Annual training ââ de-escalation techniques and 3 prevention of bias . 4 1. A law enforcement agency shall provide annual training 5 to every law enforcement officer on issues relating to 6 de-escalation techniques and the prevention of bias . Every law 7 enforcement officer in the state must participate in annual 8 training in accordance with this section . 9 2. The academy shall develop and disseminate training 10 guidelines for all law enforcement officers consistent with 11 best practice guidelines. 12 3. Every law enforcement officer shall adhere to the 13 training guidelines developed by the academy pursuant to this 14 section . The training guidelines shall include all of the 15 following: instruction on de-escalation techniques, including 16 verbal and physical tactics to minimize the need for the use of 17 force and nonlethal methods of applying force. 18 a. An emphasis on law enforcement officer understanding 19 and respect for diverse communities and the importance of 20 effective, noncombative methods of carrying out law enforcement 21 activities in a diverse community. 22 b. Instruction on diverse communities in order to foster 23 mutual respect and cooperation between law enforcement and 24 members of all diverse communities. 25 c. An examination of the patterns, practices, and protocols 26 that cause biased law enforcement actions, and the tools to 27 prevent such actions. 28 d. An examination and identification of key indices and 29 perspectives that make up differences among residents in a 30 local community. 31 e. Instruction on implicit bias and consideration of the 32 negative impact of bias, whether intentional or implicit, 33 on effective law enforcement, including examination of how 34 historical perceptions of profiling have harmed community 35 -1- LSB 2698YH (2) 91 as/js 1/ 2 H.F. 537 relations. 1 f. Instruction on the perspectives of diverse local 2 constituency groups from experts on particular cultural and law 3 enforcement-community relations issues in a local area. 4 g. A presentation of the history and the role of the civil 5 rights movement and the impact on law enforcement. 6 h. Instruction on de-escalation techniques, including verbal 7 and physical tactics to minimize the need for the use of force 8 and nonlethal methods of applying force. 9 4. In developing the training guidelines, the academy shall 10 consult with the Iowa civil rights commission, groups and 11 individuals having an interest and expertise in the field of 12 cultural awareness and diversity, and advocacy organizations 13 with an interest and expertise in the field of biased law 14 enforcement actions. The academy shall also consult with local 15 law enforcement agencies to consider challenges and barriers to 16 providing training under the guidelines and methods to ease the 17 burden on such agencies. 18